Nevada, session 83, SB168.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 678A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. “Infused pre-roll” means an individual cannabis
cigarette or joint that has been infused with concentrated
cannabis.
Sec. 3. “Label” means written or printed material affixed to
or included with cannabis or a cannabis product to provide
identification or other information.
Sec. 4. “Packaging” means the immediate, consumer-facing
wrapper or container in which cannabis or a cannabis product is
packaged.
Sec. 5. 1. “Usable cannabis” means the dried leaves and
flowers of a plant of the genus Cannabis, and any mixture or
preparation thereof, that are appropriate for the medical use of
cannabis or the adult use of cannabis.
2. The term does not include the seeds, stalks and roots of the
plant.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 6. 1. An agent of the Board may issue a hold order for
cannabis or a cannabis product to prohibit a person from
transferring or moving the cannabis or cannabis product subject
to the order without the approval of the Board or an agent of the
Board only in accordance with the regulations adopted by the
Board pursuant to this section.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations setting forth procedures
and requirements for the issuance of a hold order for cannabis or
a cannabis product. The regulations must:
(a) Authorize an agent of the Board to issue a hold order only
under circumstances in which cannabis or a cannabis product
fails to satisfy a requirement set forth in this title or the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto and constitutes a substantial
hazard to the public health.
(b) Require that at or before the time of issuance of a hold
order notice be provided to the cannabis establishment whose
cannabis or cannabis product is subject to the hold order stating
the reasons for the hold order.
(c) Require a hold order to be automatically terminated not
later than 30 days after its issuance unless the Board, after notice
and a hearing and for good cause shown, extends the duration of
the hold order.
(d) Set forth the circumstances under which a hold order may
be terminated. Such circumstances must include, without
limitation, for cannabis or a cannabis product subject to a hold
order because of the failure of any test conducted by a cannabis
independent testing laboratory, the passing of that test upon
retesting of the cannabis or cannabis product.
(e) Require the Board to publish guidelines concerning hold
orders which are based on investigations conducted by the Board
relating to such hold orders.
3. A person shall not transfer or move any cannabis or
cannabis product for which a hold order has been issued pursuant
to the regulations adopted pursuant to this section without the
approval of the Board or an agent of the Board.
Sec. 7. NRS 678A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.010 As used in this title, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678A.020 to
678A.240, inclusive, and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 8. NRS 678A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.060 “Adult-use cannabis production facility” means a
business that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
1. Is licensed by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.250; [and]
2. Acquires, possesses, manufactures, delivers, transfers,
supplies or sells adult-use cannabis products to adult-use cannabis
retail stores [.] ; and
3. Acquires, possesses, packages, supplies or sells usable
cannabis to adult-use cannabis retail stores.
Sec. 9. NRS 678A.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.205 “Medical cannabis production facility” means a
business that:
1. Is licensed by the Board pursuant to NRS 678B.210; [and]
2. Acquires, possesses, manufactures, delivers, transfers,
transports, supplies or sells medical cannabis products to medical
cannabis dispensaries [.] ; and
3. Acquires, possesses, packages, supplies or sells usable
cannabis to medical cannabis dispensaries.
Sec. 10. NRS 678A.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678A.450 1. The Board may adopt regulations necessary or
convenient to carry out the provisions of this title. Such regulations
may include, without limitation:
(a) Financial requirements for licensees.
(b) Establishing such education, outreach, investigative and
enforcement mechanisms as the Board deems necessary to ensure
the compliance of a licensee or registrant with the provisions of this
title. Such mechanisms must include, without limitation:
(1) A system to educate, train and certify employees of the
Board which:
(I) Each employee must complete before he or she may
engage in inspections, investigations or audits; and
(II) At a minimum, includes training that is the same or
substantially similar to any training that is required by the Board by
regulation to be completed by a cannabis establishment agent before
he or she may be employed by, volunteer at or provide labor to a
cannabis establishment;
(2) A system to educate and advise licensees and registrants
on compliance with the provisions of this title which may serve as
an alternative to disciplinary action; and
(3) Establishing specific grounds for disciplinary action
against a licensee or registrant who knowingly violates the law or
engages in grossly negligent, unlawful or criminal conduct or an act
or omission that poses an imminent threat to the health or safety of
the public.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(c) Requirements for licensees or registrants relating to the
cultivation, processing, manufacture, transport, distribution, testing,
study, advertising and sale of cannabis and cannabis products.
(d) Policies and procedures to ensure that the cannabis industry
in this State is economically competitive, inclusive of racial
minorities, women and persons and communities that have been
adversely affected by cannabis prohibition and accessible to persons
of low-income seeking to start a business.
(e) Policies and procedures relating to the disclosure of the
identities of the shareholders and the annual report of a cannabis
establishment that is a publicly traded company.
(f) Reasonable restrictions on the signage, marketing, display
and advertising of cannabis establishments. Such a restriction must
not require a cannabis establishment to obtain the approval of the
Board before using a logo, sign or advertisement.
(g) Provisions governing the sales of products and commodities
made from hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol by cannabis establishments.
(h) Requirements relating to the packaging and labeling of
cannabis and cannabis products. Such requirements must not
require:
(1) Any package of cannabis or cannabis products which is
sold at wholesale to contain any label or tag other than a label or
tag necessary for the functionality of any computer software used
for the seed-to-sale tracking of cannabis adopted by the Board; or
(2) A cannabis establishment to include any information on
the label for cannabis or a cannabis product that is already
included on the packaging for the cannabis or cannabis product.
2. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
gathering and maintenance of comprehensive demographic
information, including, without limitation, information regarding
race, ethnicity, age and gender, concerning each:
(a) Owner and manager of a cannabis establishment.
(b) Holder of a cannabis establishment agent registration card.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the
investigation of unlicensed cannabis activities and the imposition of
penalties against persons who engage in such activities. Such
regulations must, without limitation:
(a) Establish penalties to be imposed for unlicensed cannabis
activities, which may include, without limitation, the issuance of a
cease and desist order or citation, the imposition of an
administrative fine or civil penalty and other similar penalties.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(b) Set forth the procedures by which the Board may impose a
penalty against a person for engaging in unlicensed cannabis
activities.
(c) Set forth the circumstances under which the Board is
required to refer matters concerning unlicensed cannabis activities
to an appropriate state or local law enforcement agency.
4. The Board shall transmit the information gathered and
maintained pursuant to subsection 2 to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature on or
before January 1 of each odd-numbered year.
5. The Board shall, by regulation, establish a pilot program for
identifying opportunities for an emerging small cannabis business to
participate in the cannabis industry. As used in this subsection,
“emerging small cannabis business” means a cannabis-related
business that:
(a) Is in existence, operational and operated for a profit;
(b) Maintains its principal place of business in this State; and
(c) Satisfies requirements for the number of employees and
annual gross revenue established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 11. Chapter 678B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 12, 13 and 13.5 of this
act.
Sec. 12. The Board shall develop and maintain standardized
checklists for any item, including, without limitation, a menu item,
packaging or equipment, for which the Board requires a licensee
to obtain the approval of the Board before it is used by the
licensee. Each checklist must set forth guidelines for obtaining the
approval of the Board for the item and be designed to ensure fair
and consistent oversight by the Board.
Sec. 13. The Board shall post on its Internet website a list of
frequently asked questions pertaining to the operations of
licensees. The list must be updated:
1. Each calendar quarter with relevant questions received by
the Board during the immediately preceding calendar quarter; and
2. Not more than 30 days after the date on which the Board
provides any training to licensees relating to the operation of
licensees with relevant questions relating to the training provided.
Sec. 13.5. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
a cannabis cultivation facility and a cannabis production facility
may:
(a) Acquire, possess, deliver, transfer, supply or sell cannabis
seeds, branded merchandise and supplies related to cannabis,
including, without limitation, paraphernalia and other items
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
related to the cultivation and production of cannabis, to persons
located within and outside this State.
(b) For a cannabis cultivation facility, cultivate cannabis seeds
for the purpose of engaging in the activities authorized by
paragraph (a).
2. Any activity authorized by subsection 1 must be conducted:
(a) In compliance with any applicable requirements and
restrictions set forth in this title or established by the Board by
regulation; and
(b) If the activity is directed toward a person who is located
outside this State, in compliance with all applicable state and local
laws governing the activity in the jurisdiction in which the person
is located. A cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis production
facility shall not engage in any activity authorized by subsection 1
that is directed toward a person who is located outside this State if
any state or local law prohibits the activity in the jurisdiction in
which the person is located.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Branded merchandise” means any item which is not
cannabis or a cannabis product and which contains the logo or
other branding of a cannabis cultivation facility or cannabis
production facility, including, without limitation, an article of
clothing, pen, bag or other similar item that contains such a logo
or such branding.
(b) “Cannabis seed” means a seed of a plant of the genus
Cannabis.
Sec. 14. NRS 678B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678B.520 1. Each cannabis establishment shall, in
consultation with the Board, cooperate to ensure that all cannabis
products offered for sale:
(a) Are labeled clearly and unambiguously:
(1) As cannabis with the words “THIS PRODUCT
CONTAINS CANNABIS” in bold type . [; and] The provisions of
this subparagraph do not apply if those words in bold type are
included on the packaging of the cannabis product.
(2) As required by the provisions of this chapter and chapters
678C and 678D of NRS.
(b) Are not presented in packaging that contains an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon or toy, except that
such an item may appear in the logo of the cannabis production
facility which produced the product.
(c) Are regulated and sold on the basis of the concentration of
THC in the products and not by weight.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(d) Are packaged and labeled in such a manner as to allow
tracking by way of an inventory control system.
(e) Are not packaged and labeled in a manner which is modeled
after a brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to
children.
(f) Are labeled in a manner or presented in packaging which
indicates the amount of THC in the product, measured in
milligrams, and includes a statement that the product contains
cannabis and its potency was tested with an allowable variance of
the amount determined by the Board by regulation.
(g) Are not labeled or marketed as candy.
(h) Are labeled with [:] or presented in packaging that
includes:
(1) The words “Keep out of reach of children”;
(2) A list of all ingredients used in the cannabis product;
(3) A list of all major food allergens in the cannabis product;
and
(4) Any other information the Board may require by
regulation.
2. A cannabis production facility shall not produce cannabis
products in any form that:
(a) Is or appears to be a lollipop.
(b) Bears the likeness or contains characteristics of a real or
fictional person, animal or fruit, including, without limitation, a
caricature, cartoon or artistic rendering.
(c) Is modeled after a brand of products primarily consumed by
or marketed to children.
(d) Is made by applying concentrated cannabis, as defined in
NRS 453.042, to a commercially available candy or snack food item
other than dried fruit, nuts or granola.
3. A cannabis production facility shall:
(a) Seal any cannabis product that consists of cookies or
brownies in a bag or other container which is not transparent.
(b) Maintain a hand washing area with hot water, soap and
disposable towels which is located away from any area in which
cannabis products are cooked or otherwise prepared.
(c) Require each person who handles cannabis products to
restrain his or her hair, wear clean clothing and keep his or her
fingernails neatly trimmed.
(d) Package all cannabis products produced by the cannabis
production facility on the premises of the cannabis production
facility.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
4. A cannabis establishment shall not engage in advertising that
in any way makes cannabis or cannabis products appeal to children,
including, without limitation, advertising which uses an image of a
cartoon character, mascot, action figure, balloon, fruit or toy.
5. Each cannabis sales facility shall offer for sale containers for
the storage of cannabis and cannabis products which lock and are
designed to prohibit children from unlocking and opening the
container.
6. A cannabis sales facility shall:
(a) Convey to each purchaser of cannabis or cannabis products
the following information in a manner prescribed by the Board:
(1) To keep cannabis and cannabis products out of the reach
of children;
(2) That cannabis products can cause severe illness in
children;
(3) That allowing children to ingest cannabis or cannabis
products or storing cannabis or cannabis products in a location
which is accessible to children may result in an investigation by an
agency which provides child welfare services or criminal
prosecution for child abuse or neglect;
(4) That the intoxicating effects of edible cannabis products
may be delayed by 2 hours or more and users of edible cannabis
products should initially ingest a small amount of the product, then
wait at least 120 minutes before ingesting any additional amount of
the product;
(5) That pregnant women should consult with a physician
before ingesting cannabis or cannabis products;
(6) That ingesting cannabis or cannabis products with
alcohol or other drugs, including prescription medication, may result
in unpredictable levels of impairment and that a person should
consult with a physician before doing so;
(7) That cannabis or cannabis products can impair
concentration, coordination and judgment and a person should not
operate a motor vehicle while under the influence of cannabis or
cannabis products; and
(8) That ingestion of any amount of cannabis or cannabis
products before driving may result in criminal prosecution for
driving under the influence.
(b) Enclose all cannabis and cannabis products in opaque, child-
resistant packaging upon sale.
7. A cannabis sales facility shall allow any person who is at
least 21 years of age to enter the premises of the cannabis sales
facility.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
8. If the health authority, as defined in NRS 446.050, where a
cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility or cannabis
consumption lounge which sells edible cannabis products is located
requires persons who handle food at a food establishment to obtain
certification, the cannabis production facility, cannabis sales facility
or cannabis consumption lounge shall ensure that at least one
employee maintains such certification.
9. A cannabis production facility may sell a commodity or
product made using hemp, as defined in NRS 557.160, or containing
cannabidiol to a cannabis sales facility.
10. In addition to any other product authorized by the
provisions of this title, a cannabis sales facility may sell:
(a) Any commodity or product made using hemp, as defined in
NRS 557.160;
(b) Any commodity or product containing cannabidiol with a
THC concentration of not more than 0.3 percent; and
(c) Any other product specified by regulation of the Board.
11. A cannabis establishment:
(a) Shall not engage in advertising which contains any statement
or illustration that:
(1) Is false or misleading;
(2) Promotes overconsumption of cannabis or cannabis
products;
(3) Depicts the actual consumption of cannabis or cannabis
products; or
(4) Depicts a child or other person who is less than 21 years
of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products or objects
suggesting the presence of a child, including, without limitation,
toys, characters or cartoons, or contains any other depiction which is
designed in any manner to be appealing to or encourage
consumption of cannabis or cannabis products by a person who is
less than 21 years of age.
(b) Shall not advertise in any publication or on radio, television
or any other medium if 30 percent or more of the audience of that
medium is reasonably expected to be persons who are less than 21
years of age.
(c) Shall not place an advertisement:
(1) Within 1,000 feet of a public or private school,
playground, public park or library, but may maintain such an
advertisement if it was initially placed before the school,
playground, public park or library was located within 1,000 feet of
the location of the advertisement;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(2) On or inside of a motor vehicle used for public
transportation or any shelter for public transportation;
(3) At a sports event to which persons who are less than 21
years of age are allowed entry; or
(4) At an entertainment event if it is reasonably estimated
that 30 percent or more of the persons who will attend that event are
less than 21 years of age.
(d) Shall not advertise or offer any cannabis or cannabis product
as “free” or “donated” without a purchase.
(e) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains such warnings as may be prescribed by the
Board, which must include, without limitation, the following words:
(1) “Keep out of reach of children”; and
(2) “For use only by adults 21 years of age and older.”
(f) Shall ensure that all advertising by the cannabis
establishment contains:
(1) The name of the cannabis establishment; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, the adult-
use cannabis establishment license number or medical cannabis
establishment license number of the cannabis establishment or any
other unique identifier assigned to the cannabis establishment by the
Board.
12. A cannabis establishment that holds more than one license
may satisfy the requirement set forth in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (f) of subsection 11 if the cannabis establishment includes
in all advertising conducted by the cannabis establishment:
(a) Any one of the adult-use cannabis establishment license
numbers or medical cannabis establishment license numbers of the
cannabis establishment; or
(b) Any one unique identifier assigned to the cannabis
establishment by the Board.
13. Nothing in subsection 11 shall be construed to prohibit a
local government, pursuant to chapter 244, 268 or 278 of NRS, from
adopting an ordinance for the regulation of advertising relating to
cannabis which is more restrictive than the provisions of subsection
11 relating to:
(a) The number, location and size of signs, including, without
limitation, any signs carried or displayed by a natural person;
(b) Handbills, pamphlets, cards or other types of advertisements
that are distributed, excluding an advertisement placed in a
newspaper of general circulation, trade publication or other form of
print media;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(c) Any stationary or moving display that is located on or near
the premises of a cannabis establishment; and
(d) The content of any advertisement used by a cannabis
establishment if the ordinance sets forth specific prohibited content
for such an advertisement.
14. If a cannabis establishment engages in advertising for
which it is required to determine the percentage of persons who are
less than 21 years of age and who may reasonably be expected to
view or hear the advertisement, the cannabis establishment shall
maintain documentation for not less than 5 years after the date on
which the advertisement is first broadcasted, published or otherwise
displayed that demonstrates the manner in which the cannabis
establishment determined the reasonably expected age of the
audience for that advertisement.
15. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise
conflict with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS
678D.480, the requirements of this section pertaining to cannabis
products do not apply to ready-to-consume cannabis products
prepared and sold by a cannabis consumption lounge.
16. In addition to any other penalties provided for by law, the
Board may impose a civil penalty upon a cannabis establishment
that violates the provisions of subsection 11 or 14 as follows:
(a) For the first violation in the immediately preceding 2 years, a
civil penalty not to exceed $1,250.
(b) For the second violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.
(c) For the third violation in the immediately preceding 2 years,
a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.
(d) For the fourth violation in the immediately preceding 2
years, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.
17. As used in this section, “motor vehicle used for public
transportation” does not include a taxicab, as defined in
NRS 706.124.
Sec. 15. NRS 678D.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 678D.010 [to
678D.040, inclusive,] , 678D.020 and 678D.030 have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 16. NRS 678D.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
678D.420 1. An adult-use edible cannabis product or an
adult-use cannabis-infused product must be labeled in a manner
which indicates the number of servings of THC in the product,
measured in servings of a maximum of 10 milligrams per serving.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
2. [An] Cannabis intended for the adult-use of cannabis and
an adult-use cannabis product must be sold to a consumer in a
single package. A single package must not contain:
(a) More than [1 ounce] 2.5 ounces of usable cannabis . [or one-
eighth of an ounce of]
(b) For concentrated cannabis [.] , more than 3,500 milligrams
of THC.
[(b)] (c) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a capsule,
more than 100 milligrams of THC per capsule or more than [800]
1,000 milligrams of THC per package.
[(c)] (d) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a tincture,
more than [800] 1,000 milligrams of THC.
[(d)] (e) For an adult-use edible cannabis product, more than
100 milligrams of THC.
[(e)] (f) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a topical
product, a concentration of more than 6 percent THC or more than
[800] 2,500 milligrams of THC per package.
[(f)] (g) For an adult-use cannabis product sold as a suppository
or transdermal patch, more than 100 milligrams of THC per
suppository or transdermal patch or more than [800] 1,000
milligrams of THC per package.
[(g)] (h) For any other adult-use cannabis product, more than
[800] 1,000 milligrams of THC.
(i) For an infused pre-roll, a net weight of more than 7 grams.
3. To the extent that they are inconsistent or otherwise conflict
with the regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS
678D.480, the requirements of this section do not apply to a ready-
to-consume cannabis product prepared and sold by a cannabis
consumption lounge.
Sec. 17. NRS 678C.100 and 678D.040 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 18. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)